New York, session 2025-2026, A7516.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 368 of the laws of 2020, amending the 2 tax law relating to allowing for the establishment of an occupancy tax 3 in the city of Port Jervis, as amended by chapter 461 of the laws of 4 2022, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire September 6 1, [2025] 2027 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be 7 deemed repealed. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11368-02-5